Maine, session 132, LD1073.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §490-MM, sub-§6-A is enacted to read:
6-A. Fugitive emission. "Fugitive emission" means an unintentional emission,
leakage or discharge of liquids, solids or gases into the air, water or soil from
pressure-containing equipment or facilities and components, including, but not limited to,
valves, piping flanges, pumps, pipelines, transportation machinery, storage tanks,
compressors, retention ponds and drainage systems.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §490-MM, sub-§10-B, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 142, §2, is
amended to read:
10-B. Mine waste. "Mine waste" means all material, including, but not limited to,
overburden, rock, lean ore, leached ore or tailings, that in the process of mining and,
beneficiation, smelting or refining has been exposed or removed from the earth during
advanced exploration and mining activities.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §490-MM, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2023, c. 398, §3, is
further amended to read:
11. Mining, mining operation or mining activity. "Mining," "mining operation" or
"mining activity" means activities, facilities or processes necessary for the extraction or
removal of metallic minerals or overburden or for the preparation, washing, cleaning or
other treatment of metallic minerals and includes the bulk sampling, advanced exploration,
extraction or beneficiation of metallic minerals as well as activities and facilities for the
smelting or refining of metallic minerals and waste storage and other stockpiles and
reclamation activities, but does not include exploration or any of the following activities:
A. The physical extraction, crushing, grinding, sorting, storage or heating of calcium
carbonate or limestone to produce cement when such activity is subject to article 6,
article 8‑A or Title 12, chapter 206‑A or when such activity covers one acre or less of
surface area in total;
B. The exploration for or physical extraction, crushing, grinding, sorting or storage of
borrow, topsoil, clay or silt when such activity is subject to article 7 or Title 12, chapter
206‑A or when such activity covers 5 acres or less of surface area in total;
C. The exploration for or physical extraction, crushing, grinding, sorting or storage of
gemstones, aggregate, dimension stone or other construction materials from a quarry
that is subject to article 8‑A or Title 12, chapter 206‑A or when such activity covers
one acre or less of surface area in total; and
D. The exploration for or physical extraction, crushing, grinding, sorting or storage of
any other metallic minerals when such activity has been excluded from the
requirements of this article pursuant to a determination made by the department under
section 490‑NN, subsection 4.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §490-MM, sub-§12, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 653, §23 and
affected by §33, is amended to read:
12. Mining area. "Mining area" means an area of land described in a permit
application and approved by the department, including but not limited to land from which
earth material is removed in connection with mining, the lands on which material from that
Page 1 - 132LR2210(01)

413 mining is stored or deposited, the lands on which beneficiating or treatment facilities,
424 including groundwater and surface water management treatment systems, are located, the
435 lands on which smelting or refining facilities are located or the lands on which water
446 reservoirs used in a mining operation are located.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §490-MM, sub-§17, as repealed and replaced by PL 2017, c.
142, §3, is amended to read:
17. Tailings impoundment. "Tailings impoundment" means a surface area, contained
by dikes or dams, on which is deposited the slurry of material that is separated from a
metallic product in the beneficiation or, treatment, smelting or refining of minerals,
including any surrounding dikes constructed to contain such material. "Tailings
impoundment" does not include a lined surface area on which dewatered tailings are
stacked.
Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 653, §23 and
affected by §33, is amended to read:
B. An environmental impact assessment for the proposed mining operation that
describes the natural and artificial features, including, but not limited to, groundwater
and surface water quality, flora, fauna, hydrology, geology and geochemistry and
baseline conditions for those features in the proposed mining area and affected area
that may be affected by the mining operation and the potential impacts on those features
from the proposed mining operation. The environmental impact assessment must
define the mining area and the affected area and address, identify practicable
alternatives to address impacts to the mining area and potential impacts to the affected
area and identify the risk to flora and fauna in the mining area and affected area of
biomagnification of toxic chemicals and heavy metals associated with the proposed
mining operation. The department shall review the environmental impact assessment
and may approve, reject or require modifications to the assessment;
Sec. 7. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§2, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. A human health impact assessment for the proposed mining operation that
identifies all potential emissions and effects from the mining operation in a proposed
mining area and affected area that can reasonably be expected to cause or threaten harm
to human health, including, but not limited to, harm caused by air emissions,
contamination of groundwater or surface water, noise pollution, light pollution and the
effects of blasting and vibrations from the mining operation. The human health impact
assessment must define the mining area and affected area and identify practicable
alternatives to address identified potential human health risks, accounting for specific
risks to vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, individuals who are
pregnant, developing fetuses, children, individuals who are elderly and individuals
whose subsistence or cultural practices are dependent upon the water, soil or
environment that may be affected by the mining operation.
The human health impact assessment must include a baseline health data evaluation
that provides, for the population surrounding the proposed mining operation, the
following public health data for the 2-year period prior to the submission of the
application:
(1) The number of premature births and instances of low birth weight;
Page 2 - 132LR2210(01)

(2) The number of children diagnosed with or receiving services for autism
spectrum disorder or intellectual disabilities;
(3) The number of children receiving school-based special education services;
(4) The number of individuals receiving benefits under the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program under Title 22, section 3104;
(5) The number of children attending public schools and eligible for free or
reduced-price meals pursuant to Title 20-A, section 6601-A;
(6) The number of individuals diagnosed with or receiving treatment for asthma;
(7) The number of individuals or households with incomes below the federal
poverty level; and
(8) The number of members of a federally recognized Indian tribe, nation or band
in the State located within 30 miles of the proposed mining operation, or, if the
proposed mining operation will involve on-site smelting or refining activities and
facilities, within 125 miles of the proposed mining operation.
The human health impact assessment must include a human health risk exposure plan
that will ensure that, every 2 years following the commencement of mining, the
permittee will perform risk assessment modeling for human exposure to air emissions
from the mining operation, consistent with the human exposure model established by
the United States Environmental Protection Agency, with the results of such modeling
to be provided to the department.
The department shall review the human health impact assessment and may approve,
reject or require modifications to the assessment;
Sec. 8. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§2, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 653, §23 and
affected by §33, is amended to read:
E. Financial assurance and insurance as described in section 490‑RR; and
Sec. 9. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§4, ¶E-1 is enacted to read:
E-1. The mining operation will not involve or result in the release of perfluoroalkyl
and polyfluoroalkyl substances into the air, soil, groundwater or surface water within
any mining area or affected area. As used in this paragraph, "perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 1732,
subsection 5-A.
Sec. 10. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§4, ¶J-1 is enacted to read:
J-1. The mining operation will not involve the use of explosives or other blasting
materials that contain perchlorate.
Sec. 11. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§4, ¶K-1 is enacted to read:
K-1. The mining operation meets all applicable setback requirements specified by the
department by rule. The department shall by rule establish minimum setback
requirements for mining operations, which must include, but are not limited to,
setbacks from schools, day care facilities, residences, hospitals, national and state
parks, elder care facilities, community gardens, churches, locations considered sacred
Page 3 - 132LR2210(01)

411 by federally recognized Indian tribes, nations or bands in the State, water bodies and
422 wildlife refuges.
Sec. 12. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§4, ¶N-1 is enacted to read:
N-1. The applicant has made adequate provision for and demonstrated specific plans
to provide for and, in accordance with section 490-RR, subsection 2, paragraph A, fund
the perpetual treatment and monitoring of mine waste and tailings in the event that the
applicant fails to satisfy applicable mine waste or tailings management requirements,
applicable closure and post-closure monitoring requirements or other applicable
requirements resulting in the need for perpetual treatment of mine waste or tailings
following closure.
Sec. 13. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§4, ¶P is enacted to read:
P. The applicant has made adequate provision for and demonstrated specific plans to
address natural events that may affect mining operations, including, but not limited to,
wildfires and other fires, earthquakes, droughts, tidal waves, floods, explosions,
subsidence and other earthwork failure, and for the implementation of climate
adaptation measures in accordance with rules adopted by the department.
Sec. 14. 38 MRSA §490-OO, sub-§4, ¶Q is enacted to read:
Q. The applicant has demonstrated specific plans for ensuring that the mining
operation, to the greatest extent practicable, will use clean energy measures and
technologies, as identified by the department by rule, including, but not limited to,
generation of electricity for the mining operation through the use of solar, wind or other
clean energy technology; use of electric vehicles and electric-powered equipment in
the mining operation; and implementation of carbon capture technology for carbon
emissions from the mining operation.
Sec. 15. 38 MRSA §490-QQ, sub-§3, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. For a mining operation involving on-site smelting or refining activities or facilities,
if the mine waste or other materials resulting from those activities or facilities are
removed from the mining area for off-site storage or disposal, the department shall
require the permittee to conduct post-closure monitoring of groundwater consistent
with this subsection, or otherwise ensure that such monitoring is conducted, at any
location at which the mine waste or other materials are stored or disposed of.
Sec. 16. 38 MRSA §490-QQ, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Air quality monitoring. Through rulemaking the department shall establish
standards for monitoring air quality as close as practicable to any mining area that may
pose a threat to air quality. A permittee shall conduct air quality monitoring in accordance
with the provisions of a mining permit during mining operations, during suspension of
mining operations and during closure.
A. The permittee shall comply with applicable air quality standards and requirements
through direct measurement of emissions and not by estimating emissions
concentrations. The permittee shall conduct air emissions monitoring for pollutants as
required by the department pursuant to chapter 4 and for other hazardous air pollutants
specified by the department by rule, which must include, but are not limited to, volatile
organic compounds, polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons, hydrogen sulfides,
Page 4 - 132LR2210(01)

414 perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances as defined in Title 32, section 1732,
425 subsection 5-A, other pollutants associated with the use of petroleum-based products
436 and other pollutants that are heavy metals.
B. The permittee shall install and operate fenceline monitoring equipment for air
emissions from any stack, flue, chimney, vent or other potential source of air pollution
within a mining area and shall ensure the monitoring and measurement of fugitive
emissions to the air within a mining area, including, but not limited to, fugitive
emissions from vehicles and other equipment operated or used within the mining area.
C. The permittee shall conduct, on a schedule and in a manner directed by the
department, air emissions dispersion modeling for air emissions generated by
beneficiation, smelting and refining activities and facilities within 125 miles of the
mining area.
Sec. 17. 38 MRSA §490-RR, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 142, §9, is
amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The cost to investigate all possible releases of contaminants at the site, monitor
all aspects of the mining operation, close the mining operation in accordance with
the closure plan, conduct treatment activities of all expected fluids and wastes
generated by the mining operation for a minimum of 100 years, implement
remedial activities for all possible releases and maintenance of structures and waste
units as if these units have released contaminants to the groundwater and surface
water, conduct corrective actions for potential environmental impacts to
groundwater and surface water resources as identified in the environmental impact
assessment and conduct all other necessary activities at the mine site in accordance
with the environmental protection, reclamation and closure plan. The amount of
the financial assurance must be sufficient to provide for the perpetual treatment
and monitoring of mine waste and tailings, including mine waste and tailings
resulting from smelting or refining activities or facilities that are removed from the
mining area and stored or disposed of off-site, in the event that the permittee fails
to satisfy applicable mine waste or tailings management requirements, applicable
closure and post-closure monitoring requirements or other applicable requirements
resulting in the need for perpetual treatment of mine waste or tailings following
closure; and
Sec. 18. 38 MRSA §490-RR, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Insurance requirement. In accordance with rules adopted by the department, a
permittee shall provide proof of and maintain comprehensive general liability insurance for
the mining operation for the same duration as financial assurance is required under
subsection 1. The insurance must provide sufficient coverage to address potential harm to
members of the public located adjacent to or in proximity to mining areas or affected areas,
including, but not limited to, harm resulting from fires, explosions or flooding originating
at or caused by the mining operation and harm resulting from exposure to air, water or soil
pollution caused by the mining operation. The insurance may not include any provisions
or clauses that exclude coverage for harm or losses caused by pollution.
Sec. 19. 38 MRSA §490-SS, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 653, §23 and
affected by §33, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
Page 5 - 132LR2210(01)

2. Notification requirement. A permittee shall promptly provide the department and
each municipality in which the mining area and the affected area are located, or, in the
unorganized territory, the county commissioners for each county in which the mining area
and the affected area are located:
A. Information regarding any incident, act of nature or exceedance of a permit standard
or condition related to the mining operation that has created, or may create, a threat to
the environment, natural resources or public health and safety, including, but not
limited to, information regarding all emissions, including fugitive emissions, to the
affected area resulting from the mining operation;
B. Material safety data for all chemicals and substances used in the mining operation;
and
C. The results of any study or modeling conducted by the permittee or otherwise
available to the permittee regarding the mining operation, including, but not limited to,
human health impact assessments and human exposure modeling pursuant to section
490-OO, subsection 2, paragraph B-1 and evaluations of air, soil or water within the
mining area or affected area.
At the request of the legislative body of a municipality, or the county commissioners for a
mining area or affected area in the unorganized territory, a permittee that has provided the
municipality or county commissioners with information pursuant to this subsection shall
attend one or more public meetings within the municipality or at a location directed by the
county commissioners to provide additional information on the matter to members of the
public located adjacent to or in proximity to mining areas or affected areas.
Sec. 20. 38 MRSA §490-TT, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 653, §23 and
affected by §33, is amended to read:
2. Imminent endangerment. If the department determines that a violation under
subsection 1 mining operation is causing or resulting in, or has the potential to cause or
result in, an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health or safety,
environment or natural resources, regardless of whether a violation under subsection 1
exists, the department shall take action necessary to prevent, abate or eliminate the
endangerment. Such action may include one or more of the following:
A. Revoking the mining permit as authorized by section 342, subsection 11‑B;
B. Issuing an order to the permittee requiring immediate suspension of mining
activities, including, but not limited to, the removal of metallic product from the site;
C. Issuing an order to the permittee to undertake such other corrective or response
actions as may be necessary to prevent, abate or eliminate the endangerment; and
D. Issuance of an emergency order as authorized by section 347‑A, subsection 3.